Illinois, session 104th, SB987.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Governmental Ethics Act is amended 5by changing Section 1-101 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 420/1-101)  (from Ch. 127, par. 601-101)7    Sec. 1-101. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the "Illinois Governmental Ethics Act."9(Source: Laws 1967, p. 3401.)